Utah statutes.
63A-8-302.   Allocation of funds.
(1)  Except as provided in Subsection (2), the money collected by the office
less the office's fees shall be allocated on a prorated basis to the various
revenue types that generated the accounts receivable.
(2)  Notwithstanding the requirements of Subsection (1):
(a)  federal cost allocation requirements for specific accounts receivable
related to programs that are supported by federal funds take precedence over
other cost allocation methods provided in this section; and
(b)  the office shall use interest and fees collected on past due accounts
receivable as provided in Section 63A-8-301.
